Missouri, session 2026, SB1730.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 348, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 348.259, to read as
follows:
348.259. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Data storage center", a facility completed on or
after August 28, 2026, that is engaged primarily in:
(a) Data processing, hosting, and related services
(NAICS 518210); or
(b) Internet publishing and broadcasting and web
search portals (NAICS 519130) at the business facility;
(2) "Project costs", the total costs of construction
of a data storage center, including, but not limited to:
(a) Planning costs;
(b) Land acquisition;
(c) Infrastructure;
(d) Construction and labor costs;
(e) Machinery, equipment, and computers;
(3) "Solar farm", solar energy property that was built
or contracted to sell power on or after August 28, 2026.

SB 1730 2
2. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Innovation Endowment Fund", which shall consist of
moneys collected under this section. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at
the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of
the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest
moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of the following:
(a) All appropriations made to the fund by the general
assembly;
(b) Any gifts, bequests, and donations from any source
whatsoever;
(c) An amount equal to one-half of one percent of data
storage center project costs for each data storage center in
this state, to be deposited in equal increments over a
period of twenty years. For any data storage center that
includes at least ten thousand square feet of space
dedicated to fostering workforce development or economic
development and providing small business incubator and
research space, the amount deposited pursuant to this
paragraph shall be equal to one-quarter of one percent of
data storage center project costs, to be deposited in equal
increments over a period of twenty years; and
(d) An amount equal to one hundred dollars per
megawatt of nameplate capacity for each solar farm in this
state, as annually adjusted for inflation based on the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers in the Midwest

SB 1730 3
Region, as recorded by the United States Bureau of Labor
Statistics.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall be used by the Missouri
technology corporation to carry out its duties as prescribed
in sections 348.251 to 348.275.
3. The Missouri technology corporation may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓